Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-405.03
Use regulations; effect of annexation.

Any extraterritorial property use regulations imposed upon any annexed lands by the municipality before such annexation shall continue in full force and effect until otherwise changed.

Laws 1967, c. 74, § 3, p. 241.